Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-724
Record; amendment,
expunction, or removal; notice.

Written notice
of any amendment, expunction, or removal of any record in the central registry of child protection cases maintained
pursuant to section 28-718 shall be served upon the subject of the report
of child abuse or neglect. The department shall inform any other individuals
or agencies which received such record of any amendment, expunction, or removal
of such record.

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 12;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 14.